Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 1
BUDGET AND SERVICES

Section

PART 1 LOCAL GOVERNMENT BUDGET LAW
OF COLORADO

PART 2 INTERGOVERNMENTAL
RELATIONSHIPS

PART 3 ANNUAL LEVY - INCREASE OR
REDUCTION - LIMITATION

PART 4 ASSOCIATIONS OF
POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

PART 5 LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIFORM
ACCOUNTING LAW

PART 6 LOCAL GOVERNMENT
AUDIT LAW

PART 7 CONSTRUCTION BIDDING FOR
STATE-FUNDED LOCAL PROJECTS

PART 8 LAND DEVELOPMENT CHARGES

PART 9 LOCAL GOVERNMENT-FINANCED ENTITY

PART 10 LIMITATIONS ON SOURCES
OF REVENUE

PART 11 LOCAL GOVERNMENT
DELINQUENCY CHARGES

PART 12 PROHIBITION OF LOCAL LIMITS
ON THE FREQUENCY OF
RELIGIOUS MEETING IN HOMES

PART 13 FEDERAL FUNDS RECEIVED BY
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS

PART 14 AUTHORITY OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT
TO ENACT MINIMUM WAGE

PART 15 IDENTIFYING BARRIERS TO
HISTORICALLY UNDERUTILIZED BUSINESSES IN
LOCAL GOVERNMENT PROCUREMENT